Utah statutes.
78B-2-208.   Adverse possession -- Possession presumed in owner.
(1)  In an action for the recovery of real property, it is presumed that:
(a)  the person establishing legal title to the property has been in
possession of the property; and
(b)  any occupation of the property has been under and in subordination to the
legal title.
(2)  Subsection (1) may be rebutted by a showing that the property has been
held and possessed adversely to the legal title for at least seven years
before commencement of the action.
